en: Savory cakes, Salted savoury cake
fr: Cakes salés, cakes apéritifs, Cake salé

en: Vegetarian savory cakes, Savoury cake with vegetables
fr: Cakes salés végétariens, Cake salé aux légumes

en: Savory cakes with meat, Savoury cake with meat
fr: Cakes salés à la viande, Cake salé à la viande

en: Surprise breads
fr: Pains surprise
hr: Kruh iznenađenja
nl: Pain surprise

en: Canapés, Salted canapés
fr: Canapés, Canapés salés

fr: Blinis
nl: Blinis

en: Mini appetizer sandwiches
fr: Mini sandwichs apéritifs

en: Mini appetizer croque-monsieur
fr: Mini croque-monsieur apéritifs

en: Mini appetizer hamburgers
fr: Mini hamburgers apéritifs

en: Mini appetizer quiches
fr: Mini quiches apéritives

en: Garlic breads
de: Knoblauchbrote
fr: Pains à l'ail
hr: Kruhovi s češnjakom
ja: ガーリックトースト, ガーリックブレッド
nl: Knoflookbroden, Knoflookbrood

en: Garlic baguettes
de: Knoblauchbaguettes
fr: Baguettes à l'ail
hr: Baguette od češnjaka
nl: Knoflookstokbroden

en: Prepared bruschetta toasts
fr: Toasts bruschetta préparés

en: Puff pastry appetizers
fr: Feuilletés apéritifs

en: Mini appetizer croissants
fr: Mini croissants apéritifs

en: Mini sausage rolls, Sausage rolls
de: Wurstrollen
fr: Roulés à la saucisse, roulés aux saucisses, feuilletés à la saucisse
hr: Kolutići kobasica
nl: Saucijzenbroodjes

en: Choux pastry appetizers
fr: Choux apéritifs

en: Small cheese chou, Small cheese pastry puff, Gougère
fr: Gougères, Gougère

en: Verrines
xx: Verrines, Verrine
ja: ヴェリーヌ
ru: Веррины
sv: Verriner
zh: 法式杯装甜点

en: Savory verrines
da: Forretter i glas
fr: Verrines salées, verrines apéritives
sv: Salta verriner